Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1442.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13918(a) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 13918. Coroner's investigation.(a) Duties.--The coroner having a view of the body shall investigate the facts and circumstances concerning a death that appears to have happened within the county, notwithstanding where the cause of the death may have occurred, for the purpose of determining if an autopsy or inquest should be conducted in the following cases:* * *(12) A sudden unexplained death in a person diagnosed with epilepsy.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. Title 16 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 13921.1. Sudden unexpected death in epilepsy.(a) Inquiry.--An autopsy INVESTIGATION conducted by a coroner in this Commonwealth shall include an inquiry to determine whether the death of the deceased individual was a direct result of a seizure or epilepsy.(b) Duties of coroner.--If the findings of the autopsy INVESTIGATION under subsection (a) are consistent with known SUDEP or suspected SUDEP, the coroner shall: (1) Cause to be indicated on the death certificate of the deceased individual that SUDEP is the cause or suspected cause of death, when appropriate.(2) Provide the next of kin contact information for a third-party entity that documents and analyzes SUDEP deaths in order to reveal SUDEP risk factors and causes.(c) Applicability.--This section shall apply to counties of the first class, second class, second class A, third class, fourth class, fifth class, sixth class, seventh class and eighth class.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "sudden unexpected death in epilepsy" or "SUDEP" shall refer to a death in a patient previously diagnosed with epilepsy that is not due to trauma, drowning, status epilepticus or other known causes but for which there is often evidence of an associated seizure. STRUCTURAL CAUSES. A finding of SUDEP is definite when clinical criteria are met and an autopsy reveals no alternative cause of death, including stroke, myocardial infarction or drug intoxication , although there may be evidence of a seizure . Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1442PN1877 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930